Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1835.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 27 O.S. 2021, Section 16, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 16. A. In every case wherein where private property is


taken or damaged for public use, the person whose property is taken


or damaged shall be entitled to just compensation.


B. As used in this section:


1. “Just compensation”, as used in subsection A of this


section, shall mean the value of the property taken, and in


addition, any injury to any part of the property not taken means the


greater of:



Req. No. 2671 Page 1


a. one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the fair market


value of the property taken, or


b. the amount necessary for the owner to purchase a


comparable replacement property within the same


community; and


2. “Comparable replacement property” means property of a


similar size, location, use, utility, access, zoning, and any


improvements suitable for the needs of the owner. If no such


comparable property exists within the community, just compensation


shall reflect the cost of a substantially similar property in the


nearest comparable community.


Any special and direct benefits to the part of the property not


taken may be offset only against any injury to the property not


taken and only when such benefit is specific, direct, measurable,


and proven by a preponderance of the evidence. General,


speculative, or community-wide benefits shall not be considered. If


only a part of a tract is taken, just compensation shall be


ascertained by determining the difference between the fair market


value of the whole tract immediately before the taking and the fair


market value of that portion left remaining immediately after the


taking; provided, however, the compensation attributable to the part


actually taken shall be determined in accordance with the enhanced


compensation requirements of this subsection.



Req. No. 2671 Page 2


C. For purposes of determining the compensation required under


this section, including the calculation of fair market value and any


enhanced compensation required under subsection B of this section:


1. Fair market value shall not be reduced or discounted due to


project influence, pre-condemnation activity, threatened


condemnation, or any diminution caused by the proposed public


improvement; and


2. If the fair market value of the property on the date of the


taking exceeds the fair market value determined under paragraph 1 of


this subsection, the higher fair market value shall be used.


D. The rights and compensation standards established by this


section shall not be waived or reduced by any acquiring agency,


condemning authority, or political subdivision of this state. No


owner shall be required to waive the protections of this section as


a condition of negotiation, settlement, administrative agreement, or


voluntary conveyance.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2671 TEK 1/14/2026 11:19:27 PM











Req. No. 2671 Page 3